Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-240
County fair board; internal election; proxy vote prohibited.

The vote of a member of a county fair board for any election held within such board shall be cast by the member personally and shall not be cast by a proxy vote.

Laws 1992, LB 398, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 30.